Iowa, session 2025-2026, HSB178.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 1870YC (3) 91 ss/ns H.F. _____ Section 1. Section 101C.2, subsection 3, Code 2025, is 1 amended by striking the subsection. 2 Sec. 2. Section 101C.2, subsection 13, Code 2025, is amended 3 by striking the subsection and inserting in lieu thereof the 4 following: 5 13. âWholesalerâ means a person engaged primarily in the 6 sale of odorized propane who does not sell propane to the 7 ultimate consumer or retail propane dispenser. 8 Sec. 3. Section 101C.3, subsections 1, 2, 5, 6, 7, 9, and 9 10, Code 2025, are amended to read as follows: 10 1. The Iowa propane education and research council is 11 established. The council shall consist of ten voting members, 12 nine eight of whom represent retail propane marketers and 13 or wholesalers, one of whom shall be a representative of 14 the department of health and human services responsible for 15 community action agencies , and one of whom shall be the fire 16 marshal . Members of the council representing retail propane 17 marketers or wholesalers shall be appointed by the fire marshal 18 from a list of nominees submitted by qualified propane industry 19 organizations by December 15 of each year. A vacancy in the 20 unfinished term of a council member shall be filled for the 21 remainder of the term in the same manner as the original 22 appointment was made. Council members representing retail 23 propane marketers or wholesalers shall be full-time employees 24 or owners of a propane industry business or representatives 25 of an agricultural cooperative actively engaged in the 26 propane industry. An employee of a qualified propane industry 27 organization shall not serve as a member of the council. An 28 officer of the board of directors of a qualified propane 29 industry organization or propane industry trade association 30 shall not serve concurrently as a member of the council. 31 The fire marshal or a designee may serve as an ex officio, 32 nonvoting member of the council. 33 2. In nominating appointing members of the council, 34 qualified propane industry organizations shall give 35 -1- LSB 1870YC (3) 91 ss/ns 1/ 5 H.F. _____ due consideration to nominating council members who 1 are representative of the propane industry, including 2 representation of all of the following: 3 a. Interstate and intrastate retail propane marketers. 4 b. Interstate and intrastate wholesalers. 5 b. c. Large and small retail propane marketers, including 6 agricultural cooperatives. 7 c. d. Diverse geographic regions of the state. 8 5. A council member shall serve a term of three two years. 9 6. Initial appointments to the council shall be for terms of 10 one , and two , and three years that are staggered to provide for 11 the future appointment of at least two four members each year. 12 7. The voting members of the council shall select a 13 chairperson and other officers as necessary from the voting 14 members and shall adopt rules and bylaws for the conduct of 15 business and the implementation of this chapter . The council 16 may establish committees and subcommittees comprised of members 17 of the council and may establish advisory committees comprised 18 of persons other than council members. The council shall 19 establish procedures for the solicitation of propane industry 20 comments and recommendations regarding any significant plans, 21 programs, or projects to be funded by the council. 22 9. At the beginning of each fiscal year, the council shall 23 prepare a budget plan for the next fiscal year, including the 24 probable cost of all programs, projects, and contracts to be 25 undertaken. The council shall submit the proposed budget to 26 the fire marshal for review and comment. The fire marshal may 27 recommend appropriate programs, projects, and activities to be 28 undertaken by the council. 29 10. The council shall keep minutes, books, and records 30 that clearly reflect all of the acts and transactions of the 31 council which are public records open to public inspection. 32 The books and records shall indicate the geographic areas where 33 benefits were conferred by each individual program or project 34 in detail sufficient to reflect the degree to which each 35 -2- LSB 1870YC (3) 91 ss/ns 2/ 5 H.F. _____ program or project attained equitable geographic distribution 1 of its benefits. The books of the council shall be audited by 2 a certified public accountant at least once each fiscal year 3 and at such other times as the council may designate. The cost 4 of the audit shall be paid by the council. Copies of the audit 5 shall be provided to all council members, all qualified propane 6 industry organizations, and to other members of the propane 7 industry upon request. In addition, a copy of the audit and 8 a report detailing the programs and projects conducted by the 9 council and containing information reflecting the degree to 10 which equitable geographic distribution of the benefits of each 11 program or project was attained shall be submitted each fiscal 12 year to the chief clerk of the house of representatives and the 13 secretary of the senate. 14 Sec. 4. Section 101C.3, subsection 3, Code 2025, is amended 15 by striking the subsection. 16 Sec. 5. Section 101C.3, subsection 8, paragraph b, Code 17 2025, is amended to read as follows: 18 b. The council may develop energy efficiency programs 19 dedicated to weatherization, acquisition and installation of 20 energy-efficient customer appliances that qualify for energy 21 star certification, installation of low-flow faucets and 22 showerheads, and energy efficiency education. The council 23 may by rule establish quality standards in relation to 24 weatherization and appliance installation. 25 Sec. 6. Section 101C.11, Code 2025, is amended to read as 26 follows: 27 101C.11 Report. 28 The council shall prepare and submit an annual report to 29 the fire marshal general assembly and the auditor of state 30 summarizing the activities of the council conducted pursuant to 31 this chapter . The report shall show all of the following: 32 1. All income, expenses, and other relevant information 33 concerning assessments collected and expended under this 34 chapter . The report shall also include a 35 -3- LSB 1870YC (3) 91 ss/ns 3/ 5 H.F. _____ 2. A summary of energy efficiency programs as specified in 1 section 101C.3, subsection 8 , if developed by the council. 2 3. A copy of the audit conducted pursuant to section 101C.3, 3 subsection 10. 4 4. A report detailing the programs and projects conducted 5 by the council, which shall include information reflecting 6 the degree to which the council achieved equitable geographic 7 distribution of the benefits of each program or project. 8 Sec. 7. APPLICABILITY. The following apply to members 9 appointed to the Iowa propane education and research council on 10 or after the effective date of this Act: 11 1. The portions of the section of this Act amending section 12 101C.3, subsections 1, 2, 5, and 6. 13 2. The section of this Act striking section 101C.3, 14 subsection 3. 15